Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3501
Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History Information Act, how cited.

Sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423 shall be known and may be cited as the Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History Information Act.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 1.